Nebraska, session 109, LB756.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB756 LB756
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-3,185, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-3,185 A motor vehicle tax is imposed on motor vehicles registered
for operation upon the highways of this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles exempt from the registration fee in section
60-3,160;
(2) One motor vehicle owned and used for his or her personal
transportation by:
(a) A a disabled veteran or blind veteran of the United States Armed
Forces as defined in section 77-202.23 whose disability or blindness is
recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and who
was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of
honorable if an application for the exemption has been approved under
subsection (1) of section 60-3,189; or
(b) A surviving spouse of a disabled veteran or blind veteran if:
(i) Such veteran would have qualified for the exemption under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section at the time of death of such veteran;
and
(ii) Such surviving spouse has not remarried;
(3) Motor vehicles owned by Indians who are members of an Indian
tribe;
(4) Motor vehicles owned by a member of the United States Armed
Forces serving in this state in compliance with military or naval orders
or his or her spouse if such servicemember or spouse is a resident of a
state other than Nebraska;
(5) Motor vehicles owned by the state and its governmental
subdivisions and exempt as provided in subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of
section 77-202;
(6) Motor vehicles owned and used exclusively by an organization or
society qualified for a tax exemption provided in subdivision (1)(c) or
(d) of section 77-202 if an application for the exemption provided in
-2-

LB756 LB756
2026 2026
this subdivision has been approved under subsection (2) of section
60-3,189; and
(7) Trucks, trailers, or combinations thereof registered under
section 60-3,198.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,189, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,189 (1) A person veteran of the United States Armed Forces who
qualifies for an exemption from the motor vehicle tax under subdivision
(2) of section 60-3,185 shall apply for the exemption to the county
treasurer not more than fifteen days before and not later than thirty
days after the registration date for the motor vehicle. A renewal
application shall be made annually not sooner than the first day of the
last month of the registration period or later than the last day of the
registration period. The county treasurer shall approve or deny the
application and notify the applicant of his or her decision within twenty
days after the filing of the application. An applicant may appeal the
denial of an application to the county board of equalization within
twenty days after the date the notice was mailed.
(2) An organization which qualifies for an exemption from the motor
vehicle tax under subdivision (6) of section 60-3,185 shall apply for the
exemption to the county treasurer not more than fifteen days before and
not later than thirty days after the registration date for the motor
vehicle. For a newly acquired motor vehicle, an application for exemption
must be made within thirty days after the purchase date. A renewal
application shall be made annually not sooner than the first day of the
last month of the registration period or later than the last day of the
registration period. The county treasurer shall examine the application
and recommend either exempt or nonexempt status to the county board of
equalization within twenty days after receipt of the application. The
county board of equalization, after a hearing on ten days' notice to the
applicant and after considering the recommendation of the county
-3-

LB756 LB756
2026 2026
treasurer and any other information it may obtain, shall approve or deny
the exemption on the basis of law and of rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated by the Tax Commissioner within thirty days after the
hearing. The county board of equalization shall mail or deliver its final
decision to the applicant and the county treasurer within seven days
after the date of decision. The decision of the county board of
equalization may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and Review
Commission in accordance with the Tax Equalization and Review Commission
Act within thirty days after the final decision.
Sec. 3. Section 77-202.24, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-202.24 A mobile home shall be exempt from taxation if it is owned
and occupied by:
(1) A a disabled veteran or blind veteran of the United States Armed
Forces whose disability or blindness is recognized by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs as service connected and who was
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions); or .
(2) A surviving spouse of a disabled veteran or blind veteran if:
(a) Such veteran would have qualified for the exemption under
subdivision (1) of this section at the time of death of such veteran; and
(b) Such surviving spouse has not remarried;
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 5. Original section 60-3,189, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 60-3,185 and 77-202.24, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-4-